Hawaii statutes.
§431:10F-104 Release from liability. A
surety insurer may be released from its liability on the same terms and
conditions as are provided by law for the release of individuals as sureties.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next